Utah statutes.
10-2-120.   Powers of officers-elect.
(1)  Upon the canvass of the final election of city officers under Section
10-2-116 and until the future city becomes legally incorporated, the officers
of the future city may:
(a)  prepare and adopt, under Chapter 6, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for
Utah Cities, a proposed budget and compilation of ordinances;
(b)  negotiate and make personnel contracts and hirings;
(c)  negotiate and make service contracts;
(d)  negotiate and make contracts to purchase equipment, materials, and
supplies;
(e)  borrow funds from the county in which the future city is located under
Subsection 10-2-121(3);
(f)  borrow funds for startup expenses of the future city;
(g)  issue tax anticipation notes in the name of the future city; and
(h)  make appointments to the city's planning commission.
(2)  The city's legislative body shall review and ratify each contract made by
the officers-elect under Subsection (1) within 30 days after the effective
date of incorporation under Section 10-2-119.
